createYaml/yaml_output/VII_IND_o.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     inamo+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgProx: inamon
     inamo+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlProx: inamonoon
     inamo+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0SgObv: inamonini
     inamo+VII+Ind+Pos+Neu+0PlObv: inamoniniwan
     inamo+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgProx: inamosinoon
     inamo+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlProx: inamosinoon
     inamo+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0SgObv: inamosinini
     inamo+VII+Ind+Neg+Neu+0PlObv: inamosininiwan
